Hawaii statutes.
[§27-7] Departmental data sharing. (a)
The department of education, the University of Hawaii, the department of labor
and industrial relations, and other state agencies, as appropriate, shall share
data to support research that will improve educational and workforce outcomes
and meet the longitudinal data requirements of the federal American Recovery
and Reinvestment Act of 2009, as amended. The data to be shared shall be
determined jointly by the department of education, the University of Hawaii,
the department of labor and industrial relations, and other state agencies, as
appropriate, and shall be shared no less than annually.

(b) The department of education, the
University of Hawaii, the department of labor and industrial relations, and
other state agencies, as appropriate, shall share data in a manner that
safeguards the confidentiality of student education records, as defined by the
federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, and workforce data, as
provided by applicable federal and state laws, rules, and regulations.

(c) The department of education, the
University of Hawaii, the department of labor and industrial relations, and
other state agencies, as appropriate, shall establish a data governance and
access committee that meets on a quarterly basis to determine protocols to:

(1) Prioritize analyses and research questions that
will provide information to improve educational and workforce outcomes and
policies; and

(2) Approve requests for access to data provided by
the department of education, the University of Hawaii, the department of labor
and industrial [relations], and other state agencies, as appropriate.

(d) All state agency directors shall consider
sharing data for the statewide longitudinal data system. [L 2010, c 41, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to chapter 302A but was
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next